Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1130
Findings under act; effect.

No findings under the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act, including a finding that a person is in need of court-ordered custody and treatment, shall lead to a presumption that such person is incompetent to stand trial.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 30.